Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB853.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 431.200 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person convicted of a misdemeanor or felony for taking, injuring, or destroying
property shall restore the property or make reparation in damages if not ordered as a
condition of probation.
(2) The court in which the conviction is obtained[had], if applied to by verified petition
made within ninety (90) days of the date the sentence was pronounced, may order
restitution or enter[give] judgment against the defendant for reparation in
damages[,] and enforce collection by execution or other process.
(3) If[In] a petition for restitution or reparation is filed under subsection (2) of this
section, the court shall cause the defendant, if in custody, to be brought into court[,]
and demand of the defendant[him] if he or she has any defense to make to the
petition.
(4) (a) If the defendant[he] consents to the restitution or to reparation in damages in
an agreed sum, the court shall enter[give] judgment accordingly.
(b) If the defendant does not consent to the restitution or to reparation in
damages,[Otherwise] a jury shall be impaneled to try the facts and ascertain
the amount and the value of the property[,] or assess the damage, as may be
applicable[the case may be].
(5) A failure to pursue a[this] remedy under this section shall not deprive the person
aggrieved of his or her civil action for the injury sustained.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/3/2026 8:11 AM Jacketed